Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 3
Limitations on Agreements and Practices in Regulated
Consumer Credit Transactions

§ 28-43-301. Security in sales.

With respect to a regulated consumer credit sale, a seller may take a security interest in the property sold. In addition, a seller may take a security interest in goods upon which services are performed or in which goods sold are installed or to which they are annexed, or in land to which the goods are affixed or which is maintained, repaired or improved as a result of the sale of the goods or services, if in the case of a security interest in land the debt secured is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more, or, in the case of a security interest in goods, the debt secured is one hundred dollars ($100) or more. Except as provided with respect to cross-collateral, section 28-43-302, Idaho Code, a seller may not otherwise take a security interest in property to secure the debt arising from a regulated consumer credit sale.

A security interest taken in violation of this section is void.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-301, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-302. Cross-collateral.

In addition to contracting for a security interest pursuant to the provisions on security in sales, section 28-43-301, Idaho Code, a seller in a regulated consumer credit sale may secure the debt arising from the sale by contracting for a security interest in other property if, as a result of a prior sale, the seller has an existing security interest in the other property. The seller may also contract for a security interest in the property sold in the subsequent sale as security for the previous debt.

If the seller contracts for a security interest in other property pursuant to this section, the finance charge thereafter on the aggregate unpaid balances so secured may not exceed that permitted if the balances so secured were consolidated pursuant to the provisions on finance charge on consolidation, subsection (2) of section 28-42-304, Idaho Code. The seller has a reasonable time after so contracting in which to make any adjustments required by this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-302, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-303. Debt secured by cross-collateral.

If debts arising from two (2) or more regulated consumer credit sales, except sales pursuant to open-end credit, are secured by cross-collateral, section 28-43-302, Idaho Code, or consolidated into one (1) debt payable on a single schedule of payments, and the debt is secured by security interests taken with respect to one or more of the sales, payments received by the seller after the taking of the cross-collateral or the consolidation are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount of the debt secured by the various security interests, to have been first applied to the payment of the debts arising from the sales first made. To the extent debts are paid according to this section, security interests in items of property terminate as the debt originally incurred with respect to each item is paid.

Payments received by the seller upon an open-end consumer credit account are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount of the debt secured by the various security interests, to have been applied first to the payment of finance charges in the order of their entry to the account and then to the payment of debts in the order in which the entries to the account showing the debts were made.

If the debts consolidated arose from two (2) or more sales made on the same day, payments received by the seller are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount of the debt secured by the various security interests, to have been first applied to the payment of the smallest debt.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-303, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-304. No assignment of earnings.

A creditor may not take an assignment of earnings of the debtor for payment or as security for payment of a debt arising out of a regulated consumer credit transaction. An assignment of earnings in violation of this section is unenforceable by the assignee of the earnings and revocable by the debtor. This section does not prohibit a debtor from authorizing deductions from his earnings in favor of his creditor if the authorization is revocable, the debtor is given a complete copy of the writing evidencing the authorization at the time he signs it, and the writing contains on its face a conspicuous notice of the debtor’s right to revoke the authorization.

A sale of unpaid earnings made in consideration of the payment of money to or for the account of the seller of the earnings is deemed to be a loan to him secured by an assignment of earnings.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-304, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-305. Authorization to confess judgment prohibited.

A debtor may not authorize any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out of a regulated consumer credit transaction. An authorization in violation of this section is void.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-305, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-306. Certain negotiable instruments prohibited.

With respect to a regulated consumer credit sale, the creditor may not take a negotiable instrument other than a check dated not later than ten (10) days after its issuance as evidence of the obligation of the debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-306, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-307. Balloon payments.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if any scheduled payment of a regulated consumer credit transaction is more than twice as large as the average of earlier scheduled payments, the debtor has the right to refinance, without penalty, the amount of that payment at the time it is due. The terms of the refinancing shall be no less favorable to the debtor than the terms of the original transaction.

This section does not apply to:

A transaction pursuant to open-end credit;

A transaction to the extent that the payment schedule is adjusted to the seasonal or irregular income or scheduled payments or obligations of the debtor;

A transaction of a class defined by rule of the administrator as not requiring for the protection of the debtor his right to refinance as provided in this section; or

A transaction secured by a second deed of trust or mortgage on a one (1) to four (4) family dwelling occupied by the debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-307, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-308. Referral sales.

With respect to a regulated consumer credit sale, the seller may not give or offer to give a rebate or discount or otherwise pay or offer to pay value to the debtor as an inducement for a sale for the debtor giving to the seller the names of prospective buyers, or otherwise aiding the seller in making a sale to another person, if the earning of the rebate, discount, or other value is contingent upon the occurrence of an event after the time the debtor agrees to buy. If a debtor is induced by a violation of this section to enter into a regulated consumer credit sale, the agreement is unenforceable by the seller and the debtor, at his option, may rescind the agreement or retain the property delivered and the benefit of any services performed, without any obligation to pay for them.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-308, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-309. Restrictions on interest in land as security.

With respect to a regulated consumer loan in which the principal is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, a regulated lender may not contract for an interest in land as security. A security interest taken in violation of this section is void.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-309, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-310. Regular schedule of payments — Maximum loan term.

Regulated consumer loans, not made pursuant to open-end credit and in which the principal is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, shall be scheduled to be payable in substantially equal installments at equal periodic intervals except to the extent that the schedule of payments is adjusted to the seasonal or irregular income of the debtor, and:

Over a period of not more than thirty-seven (37) months if the principal is more than three hundred dollars ($300), or

Over a period of not more than twenty-five (25) months if the principal is three hundred dollars ($300) or less.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-310, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-311. Limitation on attorney fees.

With respect to a regulated consumer loan in which the principal is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, the agreement may not provide for the payment by the debtor of attorney’s fees. A provision in violation of this section is unenforceable.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-311, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-312. Attorney’s fees.

Except as provided by the provisions on limitations on attorney’s fees as to certain regulated consumer loans, section 28-43-311, Idaho Code, with respect to a regulated consumer credit transaction the agreement may provide for the payment by the debtor of reasonable attorney’s fees after default and referral to an attorney not a salaried employee of the creditor. A provision in violation of this section is unenforceable.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-312, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.